src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Indicative_Present_Obj
< "+Use/Sub":0 ">" 0:"TLoss" > Indicative_Present_Obj-TLoss ;
:%>  Indicative_Present_Obj-TLoss ;

< 0:">" 0:с 0:а "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.16@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:а 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.21@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.23@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:а 0:м "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:з 0:о "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:з 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.36@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.53@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:н 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.56@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.63@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.66@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:с 0:а 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_Obj-TLoss
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:з 0:а 0:т "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
<  0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
<  0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:ы 0:з 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+NonPast":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;


LEXICON IndicativePretI-plus
! Indicative Preterite I
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:д 0:е "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Indicative_PretI_Obj ;

LEXICON Indicative_PretI_Obj
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:я "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:е "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:я 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.16@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.21@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.23@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:м "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:м "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:з 0:е "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:з 0:е "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.36@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:и 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:и 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:к "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.53@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:к "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.56@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.63@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.66@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:т 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:з 0:е 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">"  0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:">"  0:Ы2 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:н 0:з 0:и 0:т "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0  0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0  0:Ы2 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;


LEXICON IndicativePrt2_kadoms
:%> IndicativePrt2_noArrow ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+Pred":0 "+Ind":0 "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Indicative_Prt2_Obj-Dial_noArrows ;
